South Dakota, session 2026, HB1091.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF SOUTH DAKOTA:
Section 1. That § 1-25-1.1 be AMENDED:
1-25-1.1. Each political subdivision shall provide public notice, with proposed
agenda, that is visible, readable, and accessible of a scheduled meeting by posting, for at
least an entire, continuous twenty-four hours immediately preceding any official meeting,
by posting a copy of the notice, visible to the public, a visible, readable, and accessible
copy of the proposed agenda, and any financial report to be voted upon, at the principal
office of the political subdivision holding the meeting and on the political subdivision's
website, if a website exists. The proposed agenda shall must include the date, time, and
location of the meeting. The notice shall also be posted on the political subdivision's
website upon dissemination of the notice, if a website exists.
If the posted proposed agenda, any attachment to the proposed agenda, or any
financial report to be voted upon contains a material error, an updated document
containing corrected information must be posted at the principal office and on any existing
website of the political subdivision at least twenty-four hours prior to the start of the
meeting.
For any special or rescheduled meeting, the information in the notice shall must be
delivered in person, or by mail, by email, or by telephone, to members of the local news
media who have requested notice. For any special or rescheduled meeting If
circumstances permit for a special or rescheduled meeting, each political subdivision shall
must also comply with the public notice provisions of this section for a regular meeting to
the extent that circumstances permit.
A violation of this section is a Class 2 misdemeanor.
Underscores indicate new language.
Overstrikes indicate deleted language.

26.337.9 2 1091
For purposes of this section, "material error" means an error that is reasonably
likely to mislead the public as to the date, time, location, subject matter, or intended
action of the meeting or the content of any attachment or financial report to be voted
upon.
Underscores indicate new language.
Overstrikes indicate deleted language.